Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,143
Controlled-access highway; entrances; exits.

No person shall drive a vehicle onto or from any controlled-access highway except at such entrances and exits as are established by competent authority.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 32;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-632;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 239.